Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-119
Telecommunications company, defined.

Telecommunications company means any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or governmental entity offering telecommunications service in Nebraska intrastate commerce.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 20.